Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 12. Confidentiality and Expungement.

§ 16.1-299.
Fingerprints and photographs of juveniles.

All duly constituted police authorities having the power of arrest shall take fingerprints and photographs of any juvenile who is taken into custody and charged with a delinquent act an arrest for which, if committed by an adult, is required to be reported to the Central Criminal Records Exchange pursuant to subsection A of §

19.2-390

. Whenever fingerprints are taken, they shall be maintained separately from adult records and a copy shall be filed with the juvenile court on forms provided by the Central Criminal Records Exchange.

If a juvenile of any age (i) is convicted of a felony, (ii) is adjudicated delinquent of an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult, (iii) has a case involving an offense, which would be a felony if committed by an adult, that is dismissed pursuant to the deferred disposition provisions of §

16.1-278.8

, or (iv) is convicted or adjudicated delinquent of any other offense for which a report to the Central Criminal Records Exchange is required by subsection C of §

19.2-390

if the offense were committed by an adult, copies of his fingerprints and a report of the disposition shall be forwarded to the Central Criminal Records Exchange and to the jurisdiction making the arrest by the clerk of the court which heard the case.

If a petition or warrant is not filed against a juvenile whose fingerprints or photographs have been taken in connection with an alleged violation of law, the fingerprint card, all copies of the fingerprints and all photographs shall be destroyed 60 days after fingerprints were taken. If a juvenile charged with a delinquent act other than a violent juvenile felony or a crime ancillary thereto is found not guilty, or in any other case resulting in a disposition for which fingerprints are not required to be forwarded to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, the court shall order that the fingerprint card, all copies of the fingerprints and all photographs be destroyed within six months of the date of disposition of the case.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 383; 1979, c. 267; 1982, c. 514; 1985, c. 211; 1986, c. 264; 1993, cc. 468, 926; 1994, cc. 859, 949; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 657; 2000, c. 431; 2004, c. 464; 2008, c. 636.

Cross references.

As to reports to school authorities of certain acts, notwithstanding the provisions of this article, see § 22.1-279.3:1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, c. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 431, in subsection B, substituted “as defined in §

16.1-228

, or a crime ancillary thereto” for “or an ‘ancillary crime’ as those terms are defined in §

16.1-228

” and inserted “and to the jurisdiction making the arrest”; and in subsection C, inserted “charged with a delinquent act other than a violent juvenile felony or a crime ancillary thereto” and inserted “or if a juvenile under fourteen is charged with a delinquent act which otherwise would be a violent juvenile felony or a crime ancillary thereto.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 464 deleted the former last sentence in subsection A, which read: “However, all duly constituted police authorities having the power of arrest shall take fingerprints and photographs of any juvenile fourteen years of age or older charged with a ‘violent juvenile felony’ as defined in §

16.1-228

”; in subsection B, deleted the clause (i) designation and former clause (ii), which read: “fourteen or older is charged with a ‘violent juvenile felony’ as defined in §

16.1-228

, or a crime ancillary thereto”; deleted “or if a juvenile under fourteen is charged with a delinquent act which otherwise would be a violent juvenile felony or a crime ancillary thereto” following “found not guilty” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 636, in subsection B, inserted clause (i), inserted clause (ii) designator and substituted present language for “adjudicated delinquent or found guilty of any offense, which would be a felony if commited by an adult,” inserted clause (iii), inserted clause (iv) designator and inserted “is convicted or adjudicated delinquent of” at the beginning of that clause.

Law Review.

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

§ 16.1-299.1.
Sample required for DNA analysis upon conviction or adjudication of felony.

A juvenile convicted of a felony or adjudicated delinquent on the basis of an act which would be a felony if committed by an adult shall have a sample of his blood, saliva or tissue taken for DNA analysis provided the juvenile was 14 years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense.

The provisions of Article 1.1 (§

19.2-310.2

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2 shall apply to all persons and all DNA samples taken as required by this section, mutatis mutandis.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall verify that a DNA sample required to be taken has been received by the Department of Forensic Science. In any case where a DNA sample has not been received, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall notify the court and the court shall require the person to submit a sample for DNA analysis.

History.

1996, cc. 755, 914; 1998, c. 280; 2003, cc. 150, 607; 2007, c. 528.

The 1998 amendment,

in the first paragraph inserted “saliva or tissue.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 150 substituted “14” for “fourteen” in the first paragraph; and deleted “blood” preceding “samples” in the second paragraph.

The 2003 amendment by c. 607 substituted “14” for “fourteen” in the first paragraph; and substituted “DNA” for “blood” preceding “samples” in the second paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 528 added the last paragraph.

§ 16.1-299.2.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 843, cl. 2.

§ 16.1-300.
Confidentiality of Department records.

The social, medical, psychiatric, and psychological reports and records of children who are or have been (i) before the court, (ii) under supervision, (iii) referred to a court service unit, or (iv) receiving services from a court service unit or who are committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice shall be confidential and shall be open for inspection only to the following:

The judge, prosecuting attorney, probation officers and professional staff assigned to serve a court having the child currently before it in any proceeding;

Any public agency, child welfare agency, private organization, facility or person who is treating or providing services to the child pursuant to a contract with the Department or pursuant to the Virginia Juvenile Community Crime Control Act as set out in Article 12.1 (§

16.1-309.2

et seq.);

The child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis and the child’s attorney;

Any person who has reached the age of majority and requests access to his own records or reports;

Any state agency providing funds to the Department of Juvenile Justice and required by the federal government to monitor or audit the effectiveness of programs for the benefit of juveniles which are financed in whole or in part by federal funds;

The Department of Social Services or any local department of social services that is providing services or care for, or has accepted a referral for family assessment or investigation and the provision of services in accordance with subsection A of §

16.1-277.02

regarding, a juvenile who is the subject of the record and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services or any local community services board that is providing treatment, services, or care for a juvenile who is the subject of the record for a purpose relevant to the provision of the treatment, services, or care when these local agencies have entered into a formal agreement with the Department of Juvenile Justice to provide coordinated services to juveniles who are the subject of the records. Prior to making any report or record open for inspection, the court service unit or Department of Juvenile Justice shall determine which reports or records are relevant to the treatment, services, or care of such juvenile and shall limit such inspection to such relevant reports or records. Any local department of social services or local community services board that inspects any social, medical, psychiatric, and psychological reports and records of juveniles in accordance with this subdivision shall not disseminate any information received from such inspection unless such dissemination is expressly required by law;

Any other person, agency or institution, including any law-enforcement agency, school administration, or probation office by order of the court, having a legitimate interest in the case, the juvenile, or in the work of the court;

Any person, agency, or institution, in any state, having a legitimate interest (i) when release of the confidential information is for the provision of treatment or rehabilitation services for the juvenile who is the subject of the information, (ii) when the requesting party has custody or is providing supervision for a juvenile and the release of the confidential information is in the interest of maintaining security in a secure facility, as defined by §

16.1-228

if the facility is located in Virginia, or as similarly defined by the law of the state in which such facility is located if it is not located in Virginia, or (iii) when release of the confidential information is for consideration of admission to any group home, residential facility, or postdispositional facility, and copies of the records in the custody of such home or facility shall be destroyed if the child is not admitted to the home or facility;

Any attorney for the Commonwealth, any pretrial services officer, local community-based probation officer and adult probation and parole officer for the purpose of preparing pretrial investigation, including risk assessment instruments, presentence reports, including those provided in §

19.2-299

, discretionary sentencing guidelines worksheets, including related risk assessment instruments, as directed by the court pursuant to subsection C of §

19.2-298.01

or any court-ordered post-sentence investigation report;

Any person, agency, organization or institution outside the Department that, at the Department’s request, is conducting research or evaluation on the work of the Department or any of its divisions; or any state criminal justice agency that is conducting research, provided that the agency agrees that all information received shall be kept confidential, or released or published only in aggregate form;

With the exception of medical, psychiatric, and psychological records and reports, any full-time or part-time employee of the Department of State Police or of a police department or sheriff’s office that is a part of or administered by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, and who is responsible for the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or motor vehicle laws of the Commonwealth, is entitled to any information related to a criminal street gang, including that a person is a member of a criminal street gang as defined in §

18.2-46.1

. Information shall be provided by the Department to law enforcement without their request to aid in initiating an investigation or assist in an ongoing investigation of a criminal street gang as defined in §

18.2-46.1

. This information may also be disclosed, at the Department’s discretion, to a gang task force, provided that the membership (i) consists of only representatives of state or local government or (ii) includes a law-enforcement officer who is present at the time of the disclosure of the information. The Department shall not release the identifying information of a juvenile not affiliated with or involved in a criminal street gang unless that information relates to a specific criminal act. No person who obtains information pursuant to this subdivision shall divulge such information except in connection with gang-activity intervention and prevention, a criminal investigation regarding a criminal street gang as defined in §

18.2-46.1

that is authorized by the Attorney General or by the attorney for the Commonwealth, or in connection with a prosecution or proceeding in court;

The Commonwealth’s Attorneys’ Services Council and any attorney for the Commonwealth, as permitted under subsection B of §

66-3.2

;

Any state or local correctional facility as defined in §

53.1-1

when such facility has custody of or is providing supervision for a person convicted as an adult who is the subject of the reports and records. The reports and records shall remain confidential and shall be open for inspection only in accordance with this section; and

The Office of the Attorney General, for all criminal justice activities otherwise permitted and for purposes of performing duties required by Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.) of Title 37.2.A designated individual treating or responsible for the treatment of a person may inspect such reports and records as are kept by the Department on such person or receive copies thereof, when the person who is the subject of the reports and records or his parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis if the person is under the age of 18, provides written authorization to the Department prior to the release of such reports and records for inspection or copying to the designated individual.

The Department may withhold from inspection by a child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis that portion of the records referred to in subsection A, when the staff of the Department determines, in its discretion, that disclosure of such information would be detrimental to the child or to a third party, provided that the juvenile and domestic relations district court (i) having jurisdiction over the facility where the child is currently placed or (ii) that last had jurisdiction over the child if such child is no longer in the custody or under the supervision of the Department shall concur in such determination.If any person authorized under subsection A to inspect Department records requests to inspect the reports and records and if the Department withholds from inspection any portion of such record or report pursuant to the preceding provisions, the Department shall (a) inform the individual making the request of the action taken to withhold any information and the reasons for such action; (b) provide such individual with as much information as is deemed appropriate under the circumstances; and (c) notify the individual in writing at the time of the request of his right to request judicial review of the Department’s decision. The circuit court (1) having jurisdiction over the facility where the child is currently placed or (2) that had jurisdiction over the original proceeding or over an appeal of the juvenile and domestic relations district court final order of disposition concerning the child if such child is no longer in the custody or under the supervision of the Department shall have jurisdiction over petitions filed for review of the Department’s decision to withhold reports or records as provided herein.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1978, cc. 738, 740; 1981, c. 487; 1988, c. 541; 1989, c. 733; 1994, c. 19; 2000, c. 212; 2002, c. 735; 2003, cc. 108, 143; 2006, cc. 431, 500; 2007, c. 511; 2009, c. 740; 2010, cc. 367, 472; 2011, cc. 99, 169; 2012, cc. 262, 421; 2017, cc. 207, 210; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 466.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2006, cc. 431 and 500, cl. 2 provides: “That the information forwarded by the Department of Corrections and the Department of Juvenile Justice to the Commonwealth’s Attorneys’ Services Council shall be in a form mutually agreeable to all parties.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 466, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Commission on Youth shall convene a work group to include representatives from the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Social Services, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Department of Education, youth and families with lived experience in the juvenile justice and child welfare systems, representatives of Virginia juvenile justice advocacy groups, representatives of local public defender offices, and representatives from other relevant state or local entities. The work group shall review current data and record sharing provisions with regard to youth served by the juvenile justice and child welfare systems and make recommendations on best practices for the sharing, collection, and use of such data and records while respecting the privacy interests of youth and families. The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice by November 1, 2021.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 212, in subdivision A 2, inserted “providing services to” preceding “the child pursuant to a contract with the Department” and added the language beginning “or pursuant to the Virginia” and ending with “Chapter 11 of this title”; added present subdivision 7; redesignated former subdivision 7 as present subdivision 8; and substituted “that,” for “which” in subdivision 8.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 735 deleted “and” at the end of subsection 7; and inserted present subsection 8 and redesignated former subsection 8 as subsection 9.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 108 deleted “who previously has been a ward of the Department and” following “person” in subdivision A 4; in the second paragraph of subsection A, deleted “who was previously a ward of the Department” preceding “may inspect,” and substituted “18” for “eighteen”; in the first paragraph of subsection B, inserted “subsection” following “referred to in,” inserted “or to a third party” preceding “provided,” added the clause (i) designation, and inserted “or (ii) that last had jurisdiction over the child if such child is no longer in the custody or under the supervision of the Department”; and in the last paragraph of subsection B, substituted “any person authorized under subsection A to inspect Department records” for “a parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis” following “If,” deleted “concerning his child” following “reports and records,” deleted “about the child’s progress” following “information” in clause (ii), and in the last sentence, inserted the clause (a) designation, inserted “or (b) that had jurisdiction over the original proceeding or over an appeal of the juvenile and domestic relations district court final order of disposition concerning the child if such child is no longer in the custody or under the supervision of the Department,” and deleted “by a parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis” following “petitions filed.”

The 2003 amendment by c. 143 rewrote subdivision A 8, which formerly read: “The attorney for the Commonwealth and adult probation and parole officers for the purpose of preparing presentence reports as provided in §

19.2-299

or discretionary sentencing guidelines worksheets, including related risk assessment instruments, as directed by the court pursuant to subsection C of §

19.2-298.01

; and”; and substituted “18” for “eighteen” in the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 431 and 500 are identical, and in subdivision A 6, inserted “including any law-enforcement agency, school administration, or probation office” and “the juvenile”; added the language beginning “or any state criminal” in subdivision A 9; added subdivision A 10 and made a related change; added the subdivision A 11 designation; and added the first paragraph of subdivision A 11.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 511 added clause (iii) in subdivision A 7 and made related changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 added subdivision A 12 and made a related change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 367 and 472 are identical, and in subdivision A 10, substituted “is entitled to any information related to a criminal street gang including” for “for purposes of a criminal investigation of an allegation of criminal gang activity involving a predicate criminal act as defined in §

18.2-46.1

or information” in the first sentence, and inserted the second and third sentences.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 99 and 169 are identical, and deleted “of Chapter 11 of this title” from the end of subdivision A 2; and in subdivision A 7, inserted “in any state,” “if the facility is located in Virginia, or as similarly defined by law of the state in which such facility is located if it is not located in Virginia,” and the last occurrence of “when release of the confidential information is” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 262 and 421 are identical, and added subdivision A 12, redesignated former subdivision 12 as 13, and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 207 and 210 are identical, and in subdivision A 10, substituted “administered by the Commonwealth” for “administrated by the Commonwealth” in the first sentence, added the third sentence, and inserted “gang-activity intervention and prevention” in the last sentence; in subsection B, deleted “hereof” preceding “when the staff of the Department” in the first paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 466, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted clause (iii) and redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (iv), inserted subdivision A 6, and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and in the last paragraph in subsection B, redesignated clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c) in the first sentence, and redesignated clauses (a) and (b) as clauses (1) and (2) in the second sentence.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 16.1-301.
Confidentiality of juvenile law-enforcement records; disclosures to school principal and others.

The court shall require all law-enforcement agencies to take special precautions to ensure that law-enforcement records concerning a juvenile are protected against disclosure to any unauthorized person. The police departments of the cities of the Commonwealth, and the police departments or sheriffs of the counties of the Commonwealth, as the case may be, shall keep separate records as to violations of law committed by juveniles other than violations of motor vehicle laws. Such records with respect to such juvenile shall not be open to public inspection nor their contents disclosed to the public unless a juvenile 14 years of age or older is charged with a violent juvenile felony as specified in subsections B and C of §

16.1-269.1

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the chief of police or sheriff of a jurisdiction or his designee shall disclose, for the protection of the juvenile, his fellow students and school personnel, to the school principal that a juvenile has been charged with or may disclose when a juvenile is a suspect in (i) a violent juvenile felony, as specified in subsections B and C of §

16.1-269.1

; (ii) a violation of any of the provisions of Article 1 (§

18.2-77

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 18.2; (iii) a violation of law involving any weapon as described in subsection A of §

18.2-308

; or (iv) a violation of law as described in subsection G of §

16.1-260

. If a chief of police or sheriff or a designee has disclosed to a school principal pursuant to this section that a juvenile is a suspect in or has been charged with a crime as specified in clauses (i) through (iv), upon a court disposition of a proceeding regarding such crime in which a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent, convicted, found not guilty or the charges are reduced, the chief of police or sheriff or a designee shall, within 15 days of the expiration of the appeal period, if there is no notice of appeal, provide notice of the disposition ordered by the court to the school principal to whom disclosure was made. If the court defers disposition or if charges are withdrawn, dismissed or nolle prosequi, the chief of police or sheriff or a designee shall, within 15 days of such action provide notice of such action to the school principal to whom disclosure was made. If charges are withdrawn in intake or handled informally without a court disposition or if charges are not filed within 90 days of the initial disclosure, the chief of police or sheriff or a designee shall so notify the school principal to whom disclosure was made. In addition to any other disclosure that is permitted by this subsection, the principal in his discretion may provide such information to a threat assessment team established by the local school division. No member of a threat assessment team shall (a) disclose any juvenile record information obtained pursuant to this section or (b) use such information for any purpose other than evaluating threats to students and school personnel. For the purposes of this subsection, “principal” also refers to the chief administrator of any private primary or secondary school.

Inspection of law-enforcement records concerning juveniles shall be permitted only by the following:

A court having the juvenile currently before it in any proceeding;

The officers of public and nongovernmental institutions or agencies to which the juvenile is currently committed, and those responsible for his supervision after release;

Any other person, agency, or institution, by order of the court, having a legitimate interest in the case or in the work of the law-enforcement agency;

Law-enforcement officers of other jurisdictions, by order of the court, when necessary for the discharge of their current official duties;

The probation and other professional staff of a court in which the juvenile is subsequently convicted of a criminal offense for the purpose of a presentence report or other dispositional proceedings, or by officials of penal institutions and other penal facilities to which he is committed, or by a parole board in considering his parole or discharge or in exercising supervision over him;

The juvenile, the parent, guardian, or other custodian of the juvenile, and counsel for the juvenile only if (i) no other law or rule of the Supreme Court of Virginia requires or allows withholding of the record; (ii) the parent, guardian, or other custodian requesting the record is not a suspect, offender, or person of interest in the record; and (iii) any identifying information of any other involved juveniles is redacted; and

As provided in §§

19.2-389.1

and

19.2-390

.

The police departments of the cities and towns and the police departments or sheriffs of the counties may release, upon request to one another and to state and federal law-enforcement agencies, and to law-enforcement agencies in other states, current information on juvenile arrests. The information exchanged shall be used by the receiving agency for current investigation purposes only and shall not result in the creation of new files or records on individual juveniles on the part of the receiving agency.

Upon request, the police departments of the cities and towns and the police departments or sheriffs of the counties may release current information on juvenile arrests or juvenile victims to the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission solely for purposes of determining whether to make an award to the victim of a crime, and such information shall not be disseminated or used by the Commission for any other purpose than provided in §

19.2-368.3

.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the exchange of other criminal investigative or intelligence information among law-enforcement agencies.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the disclosure of law-enforcement records concerning a juvenile to a court services unit-authorized diversion program in accordance with this chapter, which includes programs authorized by subdivision 1 of §

16.1-227

and §

16.1-260

. Such records shall not be further disclosed by the authorized diversion program or any participants therein. Law-enforcement officers may prohibit a disclosure to such a program to protect a criminal investigation or intelligence information.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the disclosure of accident reports and other reports required to be made to the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

46.2-374

involving a juvenile even if such reports are in the custody of a law-enforcement agency or were created by a law-enforcement officer.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-163; 1956, c. 555; 1977, cc. 559, 618; 1978, c. 740; 1981, c. 175; 1993, cc. 468, 926; 1994, cc. 859, 949; 1995, c. 752; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 430; 2000, c. 211; 2001, c. 770; 2003, c. 119; 2005, c. 683; 2009, c. 286; 2013, c. 769; 2016, c. 234; 2022, cc. 455, 456, 542.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and in subsection C, substituted “departments” for “department” in the first sentence, and deleted
the former second sentence, which read: “The information exchanged shall be limited to name, address, physical description, date of arrest, and the charge for which the arrest was made.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 211, substituted “subsections B and C” for “subsection B” near the end of subsection A.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 770 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 119 substituted “14” for “fourteen” in the last sentence of subsection A; redesignated the former last sentence of subsection A as present subsection B and
redesignated former subsections B to D as present subsections C to E; added the last three sentences to subsection B; and in subsection C, substituted “law-enforcement” for “such,” and inserted “concerning juveniles.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 683 inserted present subsection E and redesignated former subsection E as subsection F.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 286 inserted “and to law-enforcement agencies in other states” in subsection D.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 769 added the fifth through seventh sentences of subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 234 added subsection G.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 455 and 456 are identical, and in subdivision C 6, inserted “of the juvenile,” deleted “by order of the court” preceding “only if,” and added “only if (i) no other law or rule of the Supreme Court of Virginia requires or allows withholding of the record; (ii) the parent, guardian, or other custodian requesting the record is not a suspect, offender, or person of interest in the record; and (iii) any identifying information of any other involved juveniles is redacted” at the end; added subsection H; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendment by c. 542, in the second sentence of subsection A, inserted “of the Commonwealth” following “counties”, inserted “committed by juveniles”, and deleted “committed by juveniles” following “laws”; in subsection B, substituted “shall disclose” for “may disclose”, deleted “is a suspect in” following the second occurrence of “juvenile”, inserted “or may disclose when a juvenile is a suspect in”, inserted clause (iv), substituted “crime as specified in clauses (i) through (iv)” for “crime listed above” in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 59.

§ 16.1-302.
Dockets, indices, and order books; when hearings and records private; right to public hearing; presence of juvenile in court.

Every juvenile court shall keep a separate docket of cases arising under this law.

Every circuit court shall keep a separate docket, index, and, for entry of its orders, a separate order book or file for cases on appeal from the juvenile court except (i) cases involving support pursuant to §

20-61

or subdivision A 3 or subsection F or L of §

16.1-241

; (ii) cases involving criminal offenses committed by adults which are commenced on a warrant or a summons as described in Title 19.2; and (iii) cases involving civil commitments of adults pursuant to Title 37.2. Such cases shall be docketed on the appropriate docket and the orders in such cases shall be entered in the appropriate order book as used with similar cases commenced in circuit court. In any child or spousal support case appealed to the circuit court, the case files shall be open for inspection only as provided by §

16.1-305.01

.

The general public shall be excluded from all juvenile court hearings and only such persons admitted as the judge shall deem proper. However, proceedings in cases involving an adult charged with a crime and hearings held on a petition or warrant alleging that a juvenile fourteen years of age or older committed an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult shall be open. Subject to the provisions of subsection D for good cause shown, the court may, sua sponte or on motion of the accused or the attorney for the Commonwealth close the proceedings. If the proceedings are closed, the court shall state in writing its reasons and the statement shall be made a part of the public record.

In any hearing held for the purpose of adjudicating an alleged violation of any criminal law, or law defining a traffic infraction, the juvenile or adult so charged shall have a right to be present and shall have the right to a public hearing unless expressly waived by such person. The chief judge may provide by rule that any juvenile licensed to operate a motor vehicle who has been charged with a traffic infraction may waive court appearance and admit to the infraction or infractions charged if he or she and a parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the juvenile appear in person at the court or before a magistrate or sign and either mail or deliver to the court or magistrate a written form of appearance, plea and waiver, provided that the written form contains the notarized signature of the parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the juvenile. An emancipated juvenile charged with a traffic infraction shall have the opportunity to waive court appearance and admit to the infraction or infractions if he or she appears in person at the court or before a magistrate or signs and either mails or delivers to the court or magistrate a written form of appearance, plea, and waiver, provided that the written plea form containing the signature of the emancipated juvenile is accompanied by a notarized sworn statement which details the facts supporting the claim of emancipated status. Whenever the sole purpose of a proceeding is to determine the custody of a child of tender years, the presence of such juvenile in court may be waived by the judge at any stage thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-162; 1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 353; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 228; 1975, c. 334; 1977, cc. 559, 585; 1978, c. 605; 1979, c. 393; 1983, c. 293; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2018, c. 18.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and inserted the subsection A through D designations, in subsection C, deleted “except that in” following “judge shall deem proper” in the first sentence, and added the second through fourth sentences, in subsection D, in the first sentence, inserted “In” preceding “any hearing,” substituted “an alleged” for “the alleged,” and substituted “juvenile” for “child.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 18, in subsection B, updated references and added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia statutory changes in substantive criminal law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1467 (1971).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 59.